Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF474.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 6 TLSB 1906YH (3) 91 da/ns H.F. 474 Section 1. Section 162.10B, Code 2025, is amended to read 1 as follows: 2 162.10B Commercial establishments ââ inspecting state 3 licensees and registrants or state licensees . 4 1. The department may shall inspect the commercial 5 establishment of a registrant or state licensee by entering on 6 a priority and scheduled basis. 7 2. a. The department shall inspect a commercial 8 establishment on a priority basis according to criteria 9 determined relevant by the department. 10 b. The department shall enter onto its the business premises 11 at any time during normal working hours of the registrant or 12 state licensee . The department shall determine whether the 13 registrant or state licensee is complying with section 162.10A. 14 c. The department may inspect records required to be 15 maintained by the state licensee or registrant as provided in 16 this chapter . 17 d. The department must inspect the commercial establishment 18 during normal business hours. 19 e. The department shall inspect the commercial establishment 20 regardless of when the department inspected the commercial 21 establishment on a scheduled basis. 22 3. The department shall inspect a commercial establishment 23 on a scheduled basis subject to all of the following: 24 a. The department is limited to entering onto the business 25 premises of a state licensee operating as a commercial breeder. 26 b. The department must enter on the business premises of the 27 state licensee once each twelve-month period. 28 c. The department must inspect the commercial establishment 29 during normal business hours. 30 d. The department shall determine whether the state licensee 31 is complying with section 162.10A. 32 e. The department may inspect records required to be 33 maintained by the state licensee. 34 4. If the owner or person in charge of the commercial 35 -1- LSB 1906YH (3) 91 da/ns 1/ 6 H.F. 474 establishment refuses admittance to allow an inspection under 1 this section , the department may obtain an administrative 2 search warrant issued under section 808.14 . The person shall 3 comply with the search warrant. 4 Sec. 2. Section 162.10C, Code 2025, is amended to read as 5 follows: 6 162.10C Commercial establishments ââ monitoring permittees. 7 1. The department may shall monitor the commercial 8 establishment of a permittee by entering onto its business 9 premises at any time during normal working hours for the 10 limited purpose of determining whether the permittee is 11 providing for a standard of care required for permittees under 12 section 162.10A . The department shall monitor the commercial 13 establishment for the limited purpose of determining whether 14 the permittee is providing for a standard of care required for 15 permittees under section 162.10A . If the owner or person in 16 charge of the commercial establishment refuses admittance, the 17 department may obtain an administrative search warrant issued 18 under section 808.14 . 19 2. In order to enter onto the business premises of a 20 permitteeâs commercial establishment, The department shall 21 inspect the commercial establishment of a permittee on a 22 priority and scheduled basis. 23 3. a. The department shall monitor a commercial 24 establishment on a priority basis, if the department must have 25 has reasonable cause to suspect that the permittee is not 26 providing for the standard of care required for permittees 27 under section 162.10A . 28 (1) Reasonable cause must be supported by any of the 29 following: 30 a. (a) An oral or written complaint received by the 31 department by a person. The complainant must provide 32 the complainantâs name and address and telephone number. 33 Notwithstanding chapter 22 , the departmentâs record of a 34 complaint is confidential, unless any of the following apply: 35 -2- LSB 1906YH (3) 91 da/ns 2/ 6 H.F. 474 (1) (i) The results of the monitoring are used in a 1 contested case proceeding as provided in chapter 17A or in a 2 judicial proceeding. 3 (2) (ii) The record is sought in discovery in any 4 administrative, civil, or criminal case. 5 (3) (iii) The departmentâs record of a complaint is filed 6 by a person other than an individual. 7 b. (b) A report prepared by a person employed by the United 8 States department of agriculture that requires a permittee to 9 take action necessary to correct a breach of standard of care 10 required of federal licensees by the Animal Welfare Act or of 11 permittees by section 162.10A . The department is not required 12 to dedicate any number of hours to viewing or analyzing such 13 reports. 14 3. (2) When carrying out this section paragraph , the 15 department may cooperate with the United States department 16 of agriculture. The department shall report any findings 17 resulting in an enforcement action under section 162.10D to the 18 United States department of agriculture. 19 b. If the department has reasonable cause, it shall enter 20 onto the business premises of the permittee. The department 21 shall inspect a commercial establishment subject to all of the 22 following: 23 (1) The department shall determine whether the permittee is 24 complying with section 162.10A. 25 (2) The department must inspect the commercial 26 establishment during normal business hours. 27 (3) The department shall inspect the commercial 28 establishment regardless of when the department inspected the 29 commercial establishment on a scheduled basis. 30 4. The department shall inspect a commercial establishment 31 on a scheduled basis subject to all of the following: 32 a. The department is limited to entering onto the business 33 premises of a permittee operating as a commercial breeder. 34 b. The department must enter onto the business premises of 35 -3- LSB 1906YH (3) 91 da/ns 3/ 6 H.F. 474 the permittee once each twelve-month period. 1 c. The department must inspect the commercial establishment 2 during normal business hours. 3 d. The department shall determine whether the permittee is 4 complying with section 162.10A. 5 5. If the owner or person in charge of the commercial 6 establishment refuses to allow the inspection under this 7 section, the department may obtain an administrative search 8 warrant issued under section 808.14. The person shall comply 9 with the search warrant. 10